Massachusetts, session 194th, S110.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 18 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking section 18A 
and inserting in place thereof the following new section:- 
Section 18A. (a)(1). The department shall impose the sanction required by federal law on 
any recipient of public assistance funded under Title IV-A of the Social Security Act who, 
without good cause, does not cooperate with the IV-D agency specified in chapter 119A to 
establish paternity or to establish, modify, or enforce a child support order on behalf of a child 
for whom the recipient receives such public assistance. 
(2) The department shall determine that a recipient has good cause for not cooperating 
with the IV-D agency for purposes of this section if: 

of 2 10  (A) The child was conceived as a result of incest or rape; 
(B) Proceedings for the adoption of the child are pending or under consideration; 
(C) Cooperation risks discouraging the noncustodial parent or other relatives of the child 
from maintaining a relationship with the child or providing emotional or other support; 
(D) Cooperation risks physical or emotional harm to or retaliation against the child or the 
relative with whom the child resides; or 
(E) Cooperation is otherwise not in the child’s best interest. 
SECTION 2. Section 2 of chapter 118 of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
inserting at the end of the first paragraph the following:-  
Child support collected on behalf of a recipient of benefits under this chapter shall be 
paid to the family. In determining the family’s countable income, the department shall disregard 
child support paid to the family that is below the monthly federal poverty level for the family 
size. 
SECTION 3.  Section 2 of chapter 119A of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
inserting at the end of subsection (b) the following:- Pursuant to Title IV, Part D of the Social 
Security Act, in the case of former recipients of assistance, the IV-D agency shall pay to the 
family all support payments collected, including payments on arrears assigned to the state and 
payments collected through federal tax refund offset.